New York, session 2025-2026, A7793.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 837 of the laws of 2022, amending the 2 real property actions and proceedings law relating to authorizing 3 special proceedings to convey title to abandoned commercial and indus- 4 trial real property to a city, town, or village, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire June 30, 7 [2025] 2028, when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be 8 deemed repealed. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10161-01-5